Colorado, session 2026A, HB1248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-505, add (1)(d)
as follows:
42-4-505. Longer vehicle combinations - rules.
(1) (d) FOR PERMIT FEES COLLECTED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026,
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND THE COLORADO STATE
PATROL SHALL TRANSMIT ALL PERMIT FEES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO
SHALL CREDIT THE PERMIT FEES TO THE FREIGHT CASH FUND CREATED IN
SECTION 43-1-117 (6).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-510, add
-2- HB26-1248

(11)(c) and (11.5) as follows:
42-4-510. Permits for excess size and weight and for
manufactured homes - penalty - rules - definitions.
(11) (c) (I) FOR PERMIT FEES COLLECTED ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2026, THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND THE COLORADO STATE
PATROL SHALL TRANSMIT ALL PERMIT FEES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (11)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO
SHALL CREDIT THE PERMIT FEES TO THE FREIGHT CASH FUND CREATED IN
SECTION 43-1-117 (6).
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (11)(c) DOES NOT APPLY TO LOCAL FEES
IMPOSED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR LOCAL AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (11)(b) OF THIS SECTION, WHICH ARE REMITTED TO THE
APPROPRIATE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR LOCAL AUTHORITY.
(11.5) (I) BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION OR THE COLORADO STATE PATROL MAY CHARGE A
SUPPLEMENTAL OVERSIZE AND OVERWEIGHT VEHICLE SURCHARGE IN AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE CHARGED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (11)(a) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE ISSUANCE OF THE SINGLE
TRIP PERMIT; EXCEPT THAT THE SURCHARGE MUST NOT BE IMPOSED ON A
VEHICLE IF THE SINGLE TRIP PERMIT FEE WAS IMPOSED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (11)(a)(VI)(B) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION OR THE COLORADO
STATE PATROL SHALL COLLECT THE SUPPLEMENTAL OVERSIZE AND
OVERWEIGHT VEHICLE SURCHARGE AT THE SAME TIME AS IT COLLECTS THE
SINGLE TRIP PERMIT FEE. THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND THE
COLORADO STATE PATROL SHALL TRANSMIT ALL SUPPLEMENTAL
SURCHARGES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (11.5) TO THE
-3- HB26-1248

STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE SUPPLEMENTAL SURCHARGES
TO THE FREIGHT CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 43-1-117 (6).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 42-4-514 as
follows:
42-4-514. Centralized online permitting system - feasibility
study - office of freight mobility and safety - reporting - rules -
definitions.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "CENTRALIZED PERMITTING SYSTEM" MEANS THE CENTRALIZED
ONLINE PERMITTING SYSTEM FOR OVERSIZE PERMITS, OVERWEIGHT
PERMITS, AND OTHER TYPES OF FREIGHT OR TRANSPORT PERMITS ISSUED
BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, THE COLORADO STATE
PATROL, OR ANY LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR LOCAL AUTHORITY.
(b) "OFFICE" MEANS THE OFFICE OF FREIGHT MOBILITY AND
SAFETY CREATED IN SECTION 43-1-117 (4) IN THE TRANSPORTATION
DEVELOPMENT DIVISION OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.
(2) Centralized permitting system.
(a) (I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, THE OFFICE SHALL IMPLEMENT
AN ONLINE CENTRALIZED PERMITTING SYSTEM TO ALLOW A PERSON TO
OBTAIN ANY NECESSARY OVERSIZE PERMIT, OVERWEIGHT PERMIT, OR
OTHER FREIGHT OR TRANSPORT PERMITS FROM A STATE OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OR LOCAL AUTHORITY. THE CENTRALIZED PERMITTING
SYSTEM MUST ALLOW A PERSON TO APPLY FOR AND BE ISSUED ALL
NECESSARY STATE AND LOCAL PERMITS FOR A ROUTE IN A SINGLE
TRANSACTION AND PAY FOR ALL ASSOCIATED PERMIT FEES AND
SURCHARGES FOR THAT ROUTE IN A SINGLE TRANSACTION.
-4- HB26-1248

(II) IN IMPLEMENTING THE CENTRALIZED PERMITTING SYSTEM, THE
OFFICE SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION,
THE COLORADO STATE PATROL, AND APPLICABLE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
OR LOCAL AUTHORITIES.
(III) TO COMPLY WITH THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a), THE OFFICE MAY
CREATE A NEW ONLINE PERMITTING SYSTEM OR MODIFY AN EXISTING
ONLINE PERMITTING SYSTEM.
(b) (I) ALL STATE FEES OR SURCHARGES COLLECTED THROUGH THE
CENTRALIZED PERMITTING SYSTEM MUST BE TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE
TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE PERMIT FEES TO THE FREIGHT CASH
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 43-1-117 (6).
(II) ALL LOCAL FEES COLLECTED THROUGH THE CENTRALIZED
PERMITTING SYSTEM MUST BE REMITTED TO THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT OR LOCAL AUTHORITY.
(c) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER POWERS GRANTED BY LAW, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, OR THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE, IS AUTHORIZED TO NEGOTIATE AND
ENTER INTO APPROPRIATE AGREEMENTS WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND
LOCAL AUTHORITIES TO FACILITATE THE CENTRALIZED PERMITTING
SYSTEM.
(3) Feasibility study.
(a) NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, THE OFFICE SHALL STUDY
THE FEASIBILITY OF IMPLEMENTING A CENTRALIZED PERMITTING SYSTEM
AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND EVALUATE
OPPORTUNITIES TO IMPROVE PERMITTING PROCESSES.
(b) DURING THE 2027 LEGISLATIVE INTERIM, THE OFFICE SHALL
REPORT TO THE TRANSPORTATION LEGISLATION REVIEW COMMITTEE
-5- HB26-1248

CREATED IN SECTION 43-2-145 ON THE COMPLETED FEASIBILITY STUDY
AND ANY PROGRESS TOWARD IMPLEMENTING THE CENTRALIZED
PERMITTING SYSTEM.
(4) Rules. THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION MAY ADOPT RULES
AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-1-117, amend (4);
and add (6) as follows:
43-1-117. Transportation development division - created -
duties - office of freight mobility and safety - freight cash fund -
repeal.
(4) The OFFICE OF freight mobility and safety branch is created in
the transportation development division. The function of the OFFICE OF
freight mobility and safety branch is to plan, design, and implement
programs and projects that enhance freight mobility and safety within the
state. No later than January 1, 2022, the OFFICE OF freight mobility and
safety branch shall provide to the commission a long-term strategic plan
that sets forth the vision and goals for the branch OFFICE, key priorities for
all freight-related programs, activities, and projects, and guidelines for
coordination between the branch OFFICE and the freight advisory
committee.
(6) (a) THE FREIGHT CASH FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE
TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF THE PERMIT FEES CREDITED TO THE
FUND PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 42-4-505 (1)(d) AND 42-4-510 (11)(c), THE
SUPPLEMENTAL OVERSIZE AND OVERWEIGHT SURCHARGES CREDITED TO
THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-4-510 (11.5), AND ANY OTHER
MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER
TO THE FUND.
-6- HB26-1248

(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
FREIGHT CASH FUND TO THE FUND.
(c) (I) MONEY IN THE FREIGHT CASH FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY
APPROPRIATED TO THE OFFICE OF FREIGHT MOBILITY AND SAFETY FOR THE
FOLLOWING PURPOSES:
(A) TO CONDUCT THE FEASIBILITY STUDY AND SUPPORT THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND MAINTENANCE OF A CENTRALIZED ONLINE
PERMITTING SYSTEM PURSUANT TO SECTION 42-4-514;
(B) FOR FUNDING FREIGHT-RELATED PROJECTS; AND
(C) TO SUPPORT THE OFFICE IN FUNCTIONS RELATED TO FREIGHT
PROJECTS, MOVEMENT, AND INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING THE
ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE OFFICE.
(II) IN FUNDING FREIGHT-RELATED PROJECTS FROM THE FUND, THE
OFFICE SHALL ATTEMPT TO DIRECT MONEY IN A MANNER THAT IS
PROPORTIONAL TO THE AMOUNT OF FREIGHT ROUTES AND THE IMPACT OF
FREIGHT TRAFFIC IN THE AFFECTED COMMUNITY OR REGION OF THE STATE.
(d) THE FREIGHT CASH FUND IS EXEMPT FROM THE LIMITATIONS
SET FORTH IN SECTION 24-75-402.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-804, amend
(1)(c)(I); and add (1)(c)(III) as follows:
43-4-804. Highway safety projects - surcharges, fees, and fines
- crediting of money to highway users tax fund - rules - definitions -
repeal.
(1) The following surcharges, fees, and fines shall be collected
and credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201
(1)(a) and allocated to the state highway fund, counties, and
-7- HB26-1248

municipalities as specified in section 43-4-205 (6.3):
(c) (I) ON AND BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026, a supplemental oversize
and overweight vehicle surcharge in an amount equal to the amount of the
fee charged pursuant to section 42-4-510 (11)(a) C.R.S., by the
department or the Colorado state patrol for the issuance of the single trip
permit; except that the surcharge shall not be imposed on a vehicle if the
single trip permit fee was imposed pursuant to section 42-4-510
(11)(a)(VI)(B). C.R.S.
(III) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2027.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-402, amend
(5)(mmm) and (5)(nnn); and add (5)(ooo) as follows:
24-75-402. Cash funds - limit on uncommitted reserves -
reduction in the amount of fees - exclusions - definitions.
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
the following cash funds are excluded from the limitations specified in
this section:
(mmm) The reentry services for justice-involved individuals
reinvestment cash fund created in section 25.5-4-505.7; and
(nnn) The health-related social needs reinvestment cash fund
created in section 25.5-5-340; AND
(ooo) THE FREIGHT CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 43-1-117 (6).
SECTION 7. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-8- HB26-1248